Wisconsin, session 2025, SB51.
do enact as follows:SB51,11Section 1. 1.14 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB51,2,221.14 (1) (am) “Political subdivision” means any city, village, town, or county.SB51,23Section 2. 1.14 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB51,2,1041.14 (1m) (a) The U.S. flag, the state flag, the official POW/MIA flag 5recognized by Congress under P.L. 101-355, and the official flags of each branch of 6the U.S. armed forces shall be the only flags flown, hung, or displayed from any 7flagpole or building, structure, or facility, including the state capitol, that is owned 8or occupied entirely by a state agency or state authority, except that the legislature 9may direct otherwise by joint resolution adopted by a three-fourths majority vote of 10all members elected to each house.SB51,2,1611(b) The U.S. flag, the state flag, the official POW/MIA flag recognized by 12Congress under P.L. 101-355, and the official flags of each branch of the U.S. armed 13forces shall be the only flags flown, hung, or displayed from any flagpole or building, 14structure, or facility that is owned or occupied entirely by a political subdivision, 15except that a political subdivision may direct otherwise by a three-fourths majority 16vote of the members elect of its governing body.SB51,317Section 3. Adm 2.07 (1) of the administrative code is repealed.SB51,418Section 4. Initial applicability.SB51,2,2019(1) State facilities. The treatment of s. 1.14 (1m) (a) first applies to flags 20flown, hung, or displayed on January 1, 2027.SB51,521Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 22publication, except as follows:SB51,3,21(1) Notwithstanding s. 227.265, the treatment of administrative rules takes 2effect on January 1, 2027.SB51,3,33